Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB773.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "cost of the retailer" in section 202-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended to read:Section 202-A. Definitions.--As used in this article--* * *"Cost of the Retailer" shall mean the basic cost of cigarettes to the retailer plus the cost of doing business by the retailer in excess of the basic cost of cigarettes, expressed as a percentage and applied to the basic cost of cigarettes. In the absence of filing of satisfactory proof of a lesser or higher cost of doing business by the retailer making the sale, the cost of doing business by the retailer shall be presumed to be [seven] the per centum as provided in section 234-A of the basic cost of cigarettes to the retailer. When a retailer establishes a lesser cost of doing business than the presumptive [seven] per centum cost of doing business as provided in section 234-A, such lesser cost of doing business may be used to compute the cost of the retailer for a period of time no greater than twelve months, at the end of which time the cost to the retailer shall be computed using the presumptive [seven] per centum cost of doing business as provided in section 234-A, unless the retailer again establishes a lesser cost of doing business. Any fractional part of a cent in such cost per carton shall be rounded off to the next higher cent. In the case of any person who purchases cigarettes for sale at retail from any manufacturer of cigarettes without resort to a wholesaler as such, such person shall be deemed, for the purposes of this 20250SB0773PN0830 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 article, to be engaged in the sale of cigarettes as a stamping agent, wholesaler and retailer and as such shall be subject to all mark-up provisions of this article in the order named.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 234-A. Presumed Cost of Doing Business By Retailer.--The presumed cost of doing business by a retailer making the sale shall be the following per centum:(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026, nine per centum.(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, through December 31, 2027, ten per centum.(3) Beginning January 1, 2028, through December 31, 2028, eleven per centum.(4) Beginning January 1, 2029, and thereafter, twelve per centum.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0773PN0830 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617